windows/es.aff
SFX W   ertir ierten      ertir
SFX W   ervir irven       [^h]ervir
SFX W   estir isten       estir
SFX W   unir  únen        eunir
SFX W   etir  iten        etir
SFX W   ervir ierven      hervir
SFX W   irir  ieren       irir
SFX W   ibir  íben        ohibir
SFX W   ír    yen         oír
SFX W   orir  ueren       orir
SFX W   ormir uermen      ormir
SFX W   ir    en          ucir
SFX W   ir    yen         [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyen        güir
SFX W   ir    en          ullir
SFX W   ir    en          uñir
SFX W   undir úndan       ehundir
SFX W   erguir yerguen     erguir
SFX W   erguir irguen      erguir
SFX W   r     ba          ar
SFX W   er    ía          er
SFX W   ir    ía          ir
SFX W   ír    ía          ír
SFX W   r     bas         ar
SFX W   er    ías         er
SFX W   ir    ías         ir
SFX W   ír    ías         ír
SFX W   ar    ábamos      ar
SFX W   er    íamos       er
SFX W   ir    íamos       ir
SFX W   ír    íamos       ír
SFX W   r     bais        ar
SFX W   er    íais        er
SFX W   ir    íais        ir
SFX W   ír    íais        ír
SFX W   r     ban         ar
SFX W   er    ían         er
SFX W   ir    ían         ir
SFX W   ír    ían         ír
SFX W   car   qué         car
SFX W   ar    ué          gar
SFX W   zar   cé          zar
SFX W   ar    uve         andar
SFX W   ar    é           [^a]ndar
SFX W   ar    é           [^n]dar
SFX W   ar    é           [^cguzd]ar
SFX W   ar    é           [^g]uar
SFX W   uar   üé          guar
SFX W   er    í           [^fh]acer
SFX W   aber  upe         aber
SFX W   acer  ice         [fh]acer
SFX W   er    í           aler
SFX W   er    í           caer
SFX W   er    í           e[cd]er
SFX W   er    í           [eo]er
SFX W   er    í           ender
SFX W   ener  uve         ener
SFX W   er    í           er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  ise         erer
SFX W   er    í           o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  ude         oder
SFX W   er    í           olver
SFX W   oner  use         oner
SFX W   er    í           or[cd]er
SFX W   er    je          raer
SFX W   ir    í           alir
SFX W   ir    í           ebir
SFX W   ecir  ije         ecir
SFX W   ir    í           edir
SFX W   ir    í           egir
SFX W   ir    í           emir
SFX W   ír    í           [eo]ír
SFX W   ir    í           eñir
SFX W   ir    í           enchir
SFX W   ir    í           endir
SFX W   enir  ine         enir
SFX W   ir    í           entir
SFX W   ir    í           erir
SFX W   ir    í           ernir
SFX W   ir    í           ertir
SFX W   ir    í           ervir
SFX W   ir    í           estir
SFX W   ir    í           eunir
SFX W   ir    í           etir
SFX W   ir    í           irir
SFX W   ir    í           orir
SFX W   ir    í           ormir
SFX W   cir   je          ducir
SFX W   ir    í           [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    í           [üu]ir
SFX W   ir    í           ullir
SFX W   ir    í           uñir
SFX W   ir    í           erguir
SFX W   ir    í           ehundir
SFX W   ar    uviste      andar
SFX W   r     ste         [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     ste         [^n]dar
SFX W   r     ste         [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upiste      aber
SFX W   er    iste        [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  iciste      [fh]acer
SFX W   er    iste        aler
SFX W   er    íste        caer
SFX W   er    iste        e[cd]er
SFX W   er    íste        [eo]er
SFX W   ener  uviste      ener
SFX W   er    iste        ender
SFX W   er    iste        er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isiste      erer
SFX W   er    iste        o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udiste      oder
SFX W   er    iste        olver
SFX W   oner  usiste      oner
SFX W   er    iste        or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jiste       raer
SFX W   r     ste         alir
SFX W   r     ste         ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijiste      ecir
SFX W   r     ste         edir
SFX W   r     ste         egir
SFX W   r     ste         emir
SFX W   r     ste         [eo]ír
SFX W   r     ste         eñir
SFX W   r     ste         enchir
SFX W   r     ste         endir
SFX W   enir  iniste      enir
SFX W   r     ste         entir
SFX W   r     ste         erir
SFX W   r     ste         ernir
SFX W   r     ste         ertir
SFX W   r     ste         ervir
SFX W   r     ste         estir
SFX W   r     ste         eunir
SFX W   r     ste         etir
SFX W   r     ste         irir
SFX W   r     ste         orir
SFX W   r     ste         ormir
SFX W   cir   jiste       ducir
SFX W   r     ste         [^d]ucir
SFX W   r     ste         [üu]ir
SFX W   r     ste         ullir
SFX W   r     ste         uñir
SFX W   r     ste         erguir
SFX W   r     ste         ehundir
SFX W   ar    uvo         andar
SFX W   ar    ó           [^a]ndar
SFX W   ar    ó           [^n]dar
SFX W   ar    ó           [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upo         aber
SFX W   er    ió          [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  izo         [fh]acer
SFX W   er    ió          aler
SFX W   er    yó          caer
SFX W   er    ió          e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yó          [eo]er
SFX W   er    ió          ender
SFX W   ener  uvo         ener
SFX W   er    ió          er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  iso         erer
SFX W   er    ió          o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udo         oder
SFX W   er    ió          olver
SFX W   oner  uso         oner
SFX W   er    ió          or[cd]er
SFX W   er    ió          order
SFX W   er    jo          raer
SFX W   r     ó           alir
SFX W   ebir  ibió        ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijo         ecir
SFX W   edir  idió        edir
SFX W   egir  igió        egir
SFX W   emir  imió        emir
SFX W   eír   ió          eír
SFX W   eñir  iñó         eñir
SFX W   eguir iguió       eguir
SFX W   enchir inchió      enchir
SFX W   endir indió       endir
SFX W   enir  ino         enir
SFX W   entir intió       entir
SFX W   erir  irió        erir
SFX W   r     ó           ernir
SFX W   ertir irtió       ertir
SFX W   ervir irvió       ervir
SFX W   estir istió       estir
SFX W   r     ó           eunir
SFX W   etir  itió        etir
SFX W   r     ó           irir
SFX W   r     ó           ohibir
SFX W   ír    yó          oír
SFX W   orir  urió        orir
SFX W   ormir urmió       ormir
SFX W   cir   jo          ducir
SFX W   r     ó           [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yó          [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyó         güir
SFX W   ir    ó           ullir
SFX W   ir    ó           uñir
SFX W   erguir irguió      erguir
SFX W   r     ó           ehundir
SFX W   ar    uvimos      andar
SFX W   aber  upimos      aber
SFX W   er    imos        [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icimos      [fh]acer
SFX W   er    imos        aler
SFX W   er    ímos        caer
SFX W   er    imos        e[cd]er
SFX W   er    ímos        [eo]er
SFX W   er    imos        ender
SFX W   ener  uvimos      ener
SFX W   er    imos        er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isimos      erer
SFX W   er    imos        o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udimos      oder
SFX W   er    imos        olver
SFX W   oner  usimos      oner
SFX W   er    imos        or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jimos       raer
SFX W   ecir  ijimos      ecir
SFX W   enir  inimos      enir
SFX W   cir   jimos       ducir
SFX W   ar    uvisteis    andar
SFX W   r     steis       [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     steis       [^n]dar
SFX W   r     steis       [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upisteis    aber
SFX W   er    isteis      [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icisteis    [fh]acer
SFX W   er    isteis      aler
SFX W   er    ísteis      caer
SFX W   er    isteis      e[cd]er
SFX W   er    ísteis      [eo]er
SFX W   er    isteis      ender
SFX W   ener  uvisteis    ener
SFX W   er    isteis      er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isisteis    erer
SFX W   er    isteis      o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udisteis    oder
SFX W   er    isteis      olver
SFX W   oner  usisteis    oner
SFX W   er    isteis      or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jisteis     raer
SFX W   r     steis       alir
SFX W   r     steis       ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijisteis    ecir
SFX W   r     steis       edir
SFX W   r     steis       egir
SFX W   r     steis       emir
SFX W   r     steis       [eo]ír
SFX W   r     steis       eñir
