windows/es.dic
abarraganar/OPRSVWXr
abocanar/PSVWX
abravecer/QTWXq
abusar/LPSVWX
acallar/OPRSVWXr
acarrazar/OPRSVWXr
acertar/ILNOPQRSTUWXrtu
acidular/PSVWX
acolitar/PSVWX
acorrer/QTVWXt
acuñar/HPQSTVWXt
adamar/PSVWX
adjudicar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
aduanar/PSVWX
afianzar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
agalerar/PSVWX
aglutinar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
aguijonear/PQSTVWXt
ahoyar/PSVWX
alabear/PSVWX
alcalinizar/HPQSTVWXt
alfar/PSVWX
alistar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
alparcear/PSVWX
amadrinar/IPQSTVWXt
amantillar/PSVWX
amelcochar/PSVWX
amohecer/OQRTWXoq
amosquilar/OPRSVWXr
anarquizar/LPSVWX
animar/HNOPQRSTVWXrt
antruejar/PSVWX
apantallar/OPQRSTVWXrt
apear/IOPQRSTVWXrt
apesadumbrar/PSVWX
aplicar/HNOPQRSTUVWXrtu
apretujar/OPQRSTVWXrt
arañar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
aridecer/OQRTWXoq
arrear/PQSTVWXt
arrocinar/OPQRSTVWXrt
asalmerar/PSVWX
asesinar/OPQRSTVWXrt
aspirar/HLPQSTVWXt
atalajar/PSVWX
aterrorizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
atontolinar/PSVWX
atrever/INORVWXr
aupar/OPQRSTWXrt
aventajar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
azacanear/PSVWX
badajear/PSVWX
balitear/PSVWX
baraustar/PSVWX
barrear/PQSTVWXt
batear/PSVWX
berrear/OPRSVWXr
blandear/PSVWX
bolinear/PSVWX
borrajear/PQSTVWXt
buscar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
calabrotar/PSVWX
cancanear/PSVWX
cardar/PSVWX
cauterizar/HPQSTVWXt
chafar/PQSTVWXt
chicharrear/PSVWX
ciar/PSWX
cloquear/PSVWX
colicuecer/QTWXq
complotar/PSVWX
confirmar/HLOPQRSTUVWXrtu
constipar/OPRSVWXr
contrapuntear/PSVWX
corbatear/PQSTVWXt
crecer/ILORWXo
cucharear/PSVWX
debilitar/HILOPQRSTVWXrt
deleitar/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
deprimir/ORVWXr
desactivar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
desalmar/IPSVWX
desaprovechar/IPQSTVWXt
desatrancar/PQSTVWXt
descabalgar/OPQRSTVWXrt
descarriar/IOPRSWXr
descogotar/PSVWX
descoritar/PSVWX
desecar/HILOPQRSTVWXrt
desempachar/PSVWX
desenclavar/PQSTVWXt
desenmohecer/OQRTWXoq
desescombrar/PQSTVWXt
desgalgar/PSVWX
deshilachar/OPQRSTVWXrt
deslamar/PSVWX
desmarcar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desnudar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
despancar/PSVWX
despezar/PSVWX
desproveer/WY
desternerar/PSVWX
desvarar/PQSTVWXt
diablear/PSVWX
dirigir/OQRTUVWXrtu
disponer/OQRTWYoq
dramatizar/HPQSTVWXt
eludir/QTVWXt
embeleñar/PSVWX
embotar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
empadrar/OPRSVWXr
empellejar/PSVWX
empreñar/PSVWX
encañizar/PSVWX
encanalar/PSVWX
encarnecer/WX
encespedar/PSVWX
encontrar/OPQRSTUWXrtu
endechar/PSVWX
enfranquecer/WX
engastar/PSVWX
enguatar/PSVWX
enlaminar/OPRSVWXr
enmarillecer/ORWXo
enresmar/PQSTVWXt
ensebar/PSVWX
enterar/OPRSVWXr
entremesear/PSVWX
enuclear/HPQSTVWXt
equidistar/LPSVWX
escaldufar/PSVWX
escarmenar/PSVWX
escrupulizar/PSVWX
españolear/PSVWX
espiritualizar/HPSVWX
estancar/HIOPQRSTUVWXrtu
estraperlear/PQSTVWXt
exaltar/HIOPQRSTUVWXrtu
extasiar/OPQRSTUWXrtu
falsificar/HPQSTVWXt
figurear/PSVWX
fondear/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
frenar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
ganguear/PSVWX
gitanear/PSVWX
granular/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
gusanear/PSVWX
hembrear/PSVWX
hipnotizar/HPQSTVWXt
huchear/PSVWX
imbuir/QWYq
incomunicar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
infligir/QTVWXt
instar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
intrincar/INOPQRSTVWXrt
jambrar/PSVWX
jurar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
lapidar/HPQSTVWXt
letificar/LPSVWX
llanear/PSVWX
macerar/HIPQSTVWXt
maloquear/PSVWX
manir/VWX
marlotar/PSVWX
mecanizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
merodear/PSVWX
minutar/PQSTVWXt
momear/PSVWX
motejar/PSVWX
musicar/PQSTVWXt
nimbar/PQSTVWXt
obturar/HPQSTVWXt
orientalizar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
paletear/PSVWX
pardear/PSVWX
pautar/PSVWX
peregrinar/HPSVWX
pespuntear/PQSTVWXt
piratear/PQSTVWXt
plegar/IOPQRSTWXrt
porfiar/PSWX
predisponer/OQRTWYoq
prevalecer/LWX
propagar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
punchar/PSVWX
rabilar/PSVWX
rascuñar/PSVWX
realojar/PQSTVWXt
rebufar/PSVWX
rechinar/IPSVWX
recontar/IPQSTWXt
redirigir/OQRTVWXrt
refreír/QVWYq
rehilar/PSWX
religar/HPSVWX
remozar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
repicotear/PSVWX
resalir/WX
respingar/PSVWX
retejer/QTVWX
reuntar/PQSTWXt
rimar/PSVWX
rosquear/PSVWX
sacar/IOPQRSTUVWXrtu
sambenitar/PSVWX
sembrar/PQSTWXt
sincopar/NPQSTVWXt
sobreedificar/PQSTVWXt
sofisticar/HPSVWX
sonetear/PSVWX
sor/W
subentender/OQRTWXrt
supeditar/HPQSTVWXt
tacar/PSVWX
tartamudear/PSVWX
tentalear/PSVWX
titiritar/PSVWX
trafagar/LPSVWX
tranzar/PSVWX
trasnombrar/PSVWX
tribuir/QWYq
trufar/PSVWX
urbanizar/HPQSTVWXt
vapulear/IOPQRSTVWXrt
versar/PQSTVWXt
vociferar/HLPQSTVWXt
zanjar/PQSTVWXt
